Maine, session 132, LD747.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 14, as amended, is further amended to read:
SUBCHAPTER 14
SUBSIDY RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FOR HOMELESS STUDENTS
§4994-A. Subsidy Rental assistance program for homeless students
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Elementary school" has the same meaning as in Title 20‑A, section 1, subsection
10.
B. "Homeless student" has the same meaning as in Title 20‑A, section 1, subsection
13‑A.
C. "Secondary school" has the same meaning as in Title 20‑A, section 1, subsection
32.
2. Program established. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish a housing
subsidy rental assistance program for homeless students in elementary school and
secondary school. The authority shall adopt rules to implement this program. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Rental Assistance Program for Homeless Students N501
Page 1 - 132LR0019(06)

Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for rental assistance for homeless students in elementary
school and secondary school.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $125,000 $125,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $125,000 $125,000
Page 2 - 132LR0019(06)